Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 13

Department of Commerce and Insurance

4-3-1301. Creation.

There is hereby created the department of commerce and insurance.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 373a30; Code 1932, § 255; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.1; Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 1; modified; Acts 1983, ch. 311, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. The department of commerce and insurance, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of commerce and insurance, §4-3-101.

Department of commerce and insurance, organization, powers and duties, title 56, ch. 1.

Prevention and investigation of fires, duties, title 68, ch. 102.

4-3-1302. Commissioner.

The department of commerce and insurance shall be under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of commerce and insurance.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 2; Shan. Supp. § 373a32; Code 1932, § 257; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.2; Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 2; modified; Acts 1983, ch. 311, § 6.

Cross-References. Accounting for fees, §§8-22-118 —8-22-121.

4-3-1303. Divisions — Creation.

The department of commerce and insurance shall be organized under three (3) divisions, as follows:

The division of commerce and insurance;

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

The division of fire prevention; and

The division of regulatory boards.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 51; Shan. Supp. § 373a111; Code 1932, § 329; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 67; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 329 (Williams, §§ 255.70, 329); impl. am. Acts 1973, ch. 294, § 9; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 28, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-315; Acts 1983, ch. 311, § 7; 2019, ch. 459, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of consumer affairs from the department of agriculture to the department of commerce and insurance, see Executive Order No. 33 (February 11, 1983).

Acts 2019, ch. 459, § 55 provided that the division of consumer affairs in the department of commerce and insurance shall coordinate with the attorney general and reporter to transfer all documents, information, systems, and other material deemed relevant to the operation of the division of consumer affairs of the office of the attorney general and reporter.

Cross-References. Director of securities, §48-1-115.

Reorganization of divisions, §4-4-101.

Law Reviews.

Procedure in Contesting Life Insurance Policies (Aubrey F. Folts), 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 780 (1939).

4-3-1304. Administration of regulatory boards — Notification of vacancy — Termination of regulatory board — Exemption from licensure requirements.

Except as provided in § 68-115-103 relative to the Tennessee athletic commission, all state regulatory boards are attached to the division of regulatory boards, which is authorized to administer all the administrative functions and duties of the regulatory boards, except those discretionary regulatory duties and powers vested by law in the board members. The regulatory boards attached to the division are as follows:

Auctioneer commission;

Board for licensing general contractors;

Board of accountancy;

Board of court reporting;

Board of examiners for architects and engineers;

Board of examiners for land surveyors;

Board of funeral directors and embalmers;

Commission on firefighting personnel standards and education;

Motor vehicle commission;

Personnel recruiting services board;

Private investigation and polygraph commission;

Real estate commission;

State board of cosmetology and barber examiners; and

All other boards, commissions and agencies created to regulate professions, vocations and avocations in this state, except that there shall not be included the Tennessee athletic commission, the board of healing arts, the board for licensing hospitals, the stream pollution control board, the pest control board, the board of examiners for registered professional sanitarians, the board of examiners of miners or the board of law examiners.

Each regulatory board incurring a vacancy shall notify the appointing authority in writing within ninety (90) days after the vacancy occurs. All vacancies on the state regulatory boards attached to the division of regulatory boards shall be filled by the appointing authority within ninety (90) days of receiving written notice of the vacancy and sufficient information is provided for the appointing authority to make an informed decision in regard to filling such vacancy. If such sufficient information has been provided and such board has more than one (1) vacancy that is more than one hundred eighty (180) days in duration, such board shall report to the house of representatives and senate government operations committees why such vacancies have not been filled.

If more than one-half (½) of the positions on any state regulatory board are vacant for more than one hundred eighty (180) consecutive days, such state regulatory board shall terminate; provided, that such board shall wind up its affairs pursuant to § 4-29-112. If a state regulatory board is terminated pursuant to this subsection (c) it shall be reviewed by the evaluation committees pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, before ceasing all its activities. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the general assembly from continuing, restructuring, or re-establishing a state regulatory board.

As used in this subsection (d):

“License” means a permit, approval, registration, or certificate issued by a state agency and held by an individual person. The term “license” as used in this subsection (d) excludes licenses issued to business entities, firms, physical locations, and supervisory personnel;

“Member of the armed forces” means a member of the United States armed forces or a member of a reserve or Tennessee national guard unit who is in, or was called into, active service or active military service of the United States, as defined in § 58-1-102; and

“State agency” means a state board, agency, commission, or any other entity attached to the division of regulatory boards, as listed in subsection (a).

Notwithstanding any other exemption from licensure requirements, the following persons may engage in the practice of an occupation or profession regulated by a state agency under titles 16, 46, 55, 62, and 68 without being licensed pursuant to that title:

A member of the armed forces while the person is stationed within this state if:

The person holds a valid license to practice the regulated occupation or profession issued by another state or jurisdiction having reasonably similar standards for licensure;

The license is current and the person is in good standing in the state or jurisdiction of licensure;

The person agrees in writing to subject themselves to the jurisdiction of the state agency with respect to harms or violations of statutes and rules; and

The person provides notice by registering with the state agency administering the profession in which the person is licensed in the other jurisdiction to practice; and

The spouse of a member of the armed forces while the member is stationed in this state if:

The spouse holds a valid license to practice the regulated occupation or profession issued by another state or jurisdiction having reasonably similar standards for licensure;

The license is current and the spouse is in good standing in the state or jurisdiction of licensure;

The spouse agrees in writing to subject themselves to the jurisdiction of the state agency with respect to harms or violations of statutes and rules; and

The spouse provides notice by registering with the state agency administering the profession in which the person is licensed in the other jurisdiction to practice.

A person who holds a valid license to practice an occupation or profession in another state or jurisdiction and practices in this state pursuant to this subsection (d) must apply for the license in this state either prior to its expiration in the other state or jurisdiction or within one (1) year of the date the person began practicing in this state, whichever occurs first.

The commissioner and each regulatory board shall, upon application for certification or licensure, accept military education, training, or experience completed by a person toward the qualifications to receive a license or certification if such education, training, or experience is determined by the commissioner or board to be substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the license, certification or permit issued by a board, commission or agency attached to the division of regulatory boards of any member of the national guard or a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States called to active duty that expires during the period of activation shall be eligible to be renewed upon the licensee being released from active duty without:

Payment of late fees or other penalties;

Obtaining continuing education credits when:

Circumstances associated with the person's military duty prevented the obtaining of continuing education credits and a waiver request has been submitted to the appropriate regulatory board; or

The person performs the licensed or certified occupation as part of such person's military duties and provides documentation to the appropriate regulatory board; or

Performing any other act typically required for the renewal of the license or certification.

The license, certification or permit shall be eligible for renewal pursuant to subdivision (f)(1) for six (6) months from the person's release from active duty.

Any person described in subdivision (f)(1) shall provide the regulatory board which issued the license, permit or certification such supporting documentation evidencing activation as may be required by the regulatory board prior to the renewal of any license pursuant to this subsection (f).

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1967, ch. 110, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1967, ch. 184, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1967, ch. 207, § 3; Acts 1971, ch. 81, § 1; 1971, ch. 137, § 3; 1976, ch. 623, § 1; 1976, ch. 706, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 844, § 4; Acts 1978, ch. 906, § 4; 1978, ch. 924, § 1; 1979, ch. 28, § 4; T.C.A., § 4-315; Acts 1981, ch. 489, § 2; 1984, ch. 865, § 22; 1999, ch. 252, § 8(b); 2000, ch. 835, § 1; 2007, ch. 407, § 1; 2008, ch. 1149, §§ 4, 5; 2011, ch. 230, § 2; 2013, ch. 122, §§ 2, 4, 6; 2014, ch. 964, § 1; 2015, ch. 355, § 1; 2019, ch. 195, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 835, § 7, provided that this act shall not change any procedure, manner, or time that members of the Tennessee motor vehicle commission who are selected from a list of qualified persons submitted by motor vehicle manufacturers licensed in Tennessee or their consumer replacements are appointed pursuant to §55-17-103.

Acts 2013, ch. 122, § 7 provided that each entity subject to the act shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Notwithstanding §4-5-208, each entity subject to the act is authorized to promulgate emergency rules to implement the act.

Acts 2015, ch. 355, § 3 provided that all records of the Tennessee Board of Court Reporting in the possession of the Administrative Office of the Courts on July 1, 2015, shall be transferred to and remain in the custody of the Division of Regulatory Boards in the Department of Commerce and Insurance.

Acts 2015, ch. 355, § 4 provided The Tennessee Board of Court Reporting is directed to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble the act concerning transfer of administration of the Tennessee Board of Court Reporting to the Division of Regulatory Boards in the Department of Commerce, see Acts 2015, ch. 355.

Acts 2019, ch. 195, § 3 provided that the commissioner of commerce and insurance and the commissioner of health shall promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2019, ch. 195, § 4 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to all persons who make application for an exemption from licensure under the act.

Cross-References. Division of regulatory boards, title 56, ch. 1, part 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to terminated board or commission, OAG 98-045, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 45 (2/17/98).

T.C.A. §62-1-105 gives the board of accountancy the sole authority to hire and terminate its executive director and any other member of its staff requiring professional qualifications, OAG 04-060, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 58 (4/08/04).

4-3-1305. Safeguards for retirement living facilities guaranteeing continued medical care and services — Regulations — Actions.

The department of commerce and insurance has the authority to determine whether any facility that has guaranteed or guarantees to provide medical coverage for its residents has adequate safeguards in place to ensure that such medical care will be provided as guaranteed. If the department determines that adequate safeguards have not been established, the department has the authority to require that such provider place a sufficient amount of funds in escrow to ensure that such medical care will be provided. The escrow account shall be established in a manner authorized by the department.

If the department requires an escrow account for a present provider, then prior to the expansion of any proposed facilities for which continuing care agreements are to be signed, the provider must establish a comparable escrow account and deposit a specified amount into such account as determined by the department as funds are contributed by residents for such facilities. This section shall apply only to retirement living facilities that offer or propose to offer continuing life care services to individuals for a fee.

The commissioner may from time to time make, promulgate, amend and rescind such rules as are necessary to carry out this section.

All rules provided for in this part shall be adopted, promulgated and contested as provided in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any facility that has guaranteed or guarantees to provide medical coverage for its residents has not established adequate safeguards to ensure that such medical care will be provided as guaranteed, the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion, bring an action in the chancery court in any county in this state to enforce compliance with this part or any rule or order under this part.

Upon a proper showing, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, writ of mandamus, disgorgement or other proper equitable relief shall be granted, and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant's assets.

The court may not require the commissioner to post a bond.

Acts 1987, ch. 341, § 1; 1989, ch. 301, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Continuing Care Laws of Arkansas, Tennessee and North Carolina (Harry E. Groves), 20 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 159 (1990).

4-3-1306. License, certification or registration — Notifications — Prerequisites — Website — Notifications by electronic mail.

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall notify each applicant for a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, division, board, commission, agency or other governmental entity where to obtain a copy of any statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines setting forth the prerequisites for the license, certification or registration and shall, upon request, make available to the applicant a copy of the statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines.

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall notify each holder of a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, division, board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity of changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines, upon the issuance and upon each renewal of a holder's license, certification or registration.

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall establish and maintain a link or links on the entity's website to the statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines that are implemented or enforced by the entity and that impact an applicant for, or a holder of, a professional or occupational license, certification, or registration from the entity.

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, agency, or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall allow each holder of a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, division, board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity to have the option of being notified by electronic mail of:

Renewals of the holder's license, certification or registration;

Any fee increases;

Any changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies and guidelines; and

Any meeting where changes in rules or fees are on the agenda. For purposes of this subdivision (d)(1)(D), the electronic notice shall be at least forty-five (45) days in advance of the meeting, unless it is an emergency meeting then the notice shall be sent as soon as is practicable.

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall notify each holder of a license, certification or registration of the availability of receiving electronic notices pursuant to subdivision (d)(1) upon issuance or renewal of the holder's license, certification or registration.

Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 8; 2012, ch. 952, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 13 provided that each entity subject to the act shall promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.